Washington statutes.
RCW 43.33.010

Composition of committee.

The state treasurer, the lieutenant governor, and the governor, ex officio, shall constitute the state finance committee.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.33.010. Prior: 1961 c 300 s 2; 1921 c 7 s 6, part; RRS s 10764, part.]